Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Chapter 26. Qualified Education Loan Servicers.

§ 6.2-2600.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Licensee”
means a person to whom a license has been issued under this chapter.

“Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry”
or

“Registry”

means the nationwide multistate licensing system and registry created by the Conference of State Bank Supervisors and the American Association of Residential Mortgage Regulators.

“Principal”
means any person who, directly or indirectly, owns or controls (i) 10 percent or more of the outstanding stock of a stock corporation or (ii) a 10 percent or greater interest in any other type of entity.

“Qualified education loan”
means any loan primarily used to finance a postsecondary education and costs of attendance at a postsecondary public or private educational institution, including tuition, fees, books and supplies, room and board, transportation, and miscellaneous personal expenses. “Qualified education loan” includes a loan made to refinance a qualified education loan. “Qualified education loan” does not include an extension of credit under an open-end credit plan, a reverse mortgage transaction, a residential mortgage transaction, or any other loan that is secured by real property or a dwelling.

“Qualified education loan borrower”
or

“borrower”

means (i) any current resident of the Commonwealth who has received or agreed to pay a qualified education loan or (ii) any person who is contractually obligated with such resident for repaying the qualified education loan.

“Qualified education loan servicer”
or

“loan servicer”

means any person, wherever located, that:

Receives any scheduled periodic payments from a qualified education loan borrower or notification of such payments or (ii) applies payments to the qualified education loan borrower’s account pursuant to the terms of the qualified education loan or the contract governing the servicing;
1. (i) Receives any scheduled periodic payments from a qualified education loan borrower or notification of such payments or (ii) applies payments to the qualified education loan borrower’s account pursuant to the terms of the qualified education loan or the contract governing the servicing;

During a period when no payment is required on a qualified education loan, (i) maintains account records for the qualified education loan and (ii) communicates with the qualified education loan borrower regarding the qualified education loan, on behalf of the qualified education loan’s holder; and

Interacts with a qualified education loan borrower, which includes conducting activities to help prevent default on obligations arising from qualified education loans or to facilitate any activity described in clause (i) or (ii) of subdivision 1.

“Servicing”
means:

1. (i)

Receiving any scheduled periodic payments from a qualified education loan borrower or notification of such payments or (ii) applying the payments of principal and interest and such other payments, with respect to the amounts received from a qualified education loan borrower, as may be required pursuant to the terms of a qualified education loan;

2.

During a period when no payment is required on a qualified education loan, (i) maintaining account records for the loan and (ii) communicating with the qualified education loan borrower regarding the qualified education loan, on behalf of the qualified education loan’s holder; and

3.

Interacting with a qualified education loan borrower, including conducting activities to help prevent default on obligations arising from qualified education loans or to facilitate any activity described in clause (i) or (ii) of subdivision 1.

History.

2020, cc. 1198, 1250; 2022, cc. 370, 371.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1198 and 1250, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1198 and 1250, cl. 3 provides: “That on or before March 1, 2021, the State Corporation Commission shall begin accepting applications for licenses to be issued pursuant to Chapter 26 (§

6.2-2600

et seq.) of Title 6.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, when such chapter becomes effective. Applications filed with the Commission may be investigated prior to July 1, 2021, in accordance with §

6.2-2605

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1198 and 1250, cl. 4 provides: “That the State Corporation Commission (the Commission) shall provide a report to members of the House Committee on Labor and Commerce, the Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor, the House Committee on Education, and the Senate Committee on Education and Health on or before November 1, 2022, that contains the following: (i) the number of licenses issued under Chapter 26 (§

6.2-2600

et seq.) of Title 6.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act (the Chapter); (ii) the number of applications for a license under the Chapter that have been denied and the reasons for such denials; (iii) the number of licensees under the Chapter that filed a written report with the Commission pursuant to subsection A of §

6.2-2612

, as created by this act, and for which of the events enumerated in subdivisions A 1 through 5 of §

6.2-2612

, as created by this act, the written report was filed; (iv) the number and nature of complaints received under the Chapter; and (v) the number of investigations and examinations resulting from such complaints and the disposition of such investigations and examinations.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 370 and 371 are identical, and in the definition of “Qualified education loan servicer” or “loan servicer” and in the definition of “Servicing,” substituted “and” for “or” between subdivisions 2 and 3.

§ 6.2-2601.
License requirement; exceptions.

No person shall act as a qualified education loan servicer, directly or indirectly, whether or not the person has an office or any other physical presence in the Commonwealth, except in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and without having first obtained a license under this chapter from the Commission.

Every qualified education loan servicer required to be licensed under this chapter shall register with the Registry and be subject to such registration and renewal requirements as may be established by the Registry, in addition to any requirements of this chapter. In adopting regulations pursuant to §

6.2-2622

, the Commission shall include any terms, conditions, or requirements applicable to such registration and renewal. Any fees required by the Registry shall be separate and apart from any fees imposed by this chapter. The Commission, at its discretion, may collect any registration and renewal fees on behalf of the Registry and remit such fees to the Registry or permit the Registry to collect any fees imposed by this chapter and remit such fees to the Commission.

In connection with its implementation and administration of this chapter, the Commission may establish agreements or contracts with the Registry or other entities designated by the Registry to collect, distribute, and maintain information and records, and process fees, related to qualified education loan servicers required to be licensed under this chapter. In establishing such agreements or contracts, the Commission shall not be subject to the Virginia Public Procurement Act (§

2.2-4300

et seq.).

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to:

Any bank, savings institution, credit union, or financial institution subject to regulation under 12 U.S.C. § 2002;

Any wholly owned subsidiary of any bank, savings institution, or credit union, provided that such wholly owned subsidiary is subject to the general supervision or regulation of, or subject to audit or examination by, a regulatory body or agency of the United States or any state; or

Any public or private nonprofit institution of higher education.

History.

2020, cc. 1198, 1250.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1198 and 1250, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1198 and 1250, cl. 3 provides: “That on or before March 1, 2021, the State Corporation Commission shall begin accepting applications for licenses to be issued pursuant to Chapter 26 (§

6.2-2600

et seq.) of Title 6.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, when such chapter becomes effective. Applications filed with the Commission may be investigated prior to July 1, 2021, in accordance with §

6.2-2605

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act.”

§ 6.2-2602.
Licensure of qualified education loan servicers; automatic issuance of license for federal student loan servicing contractors.

A person seeking to act as a qualified education loan servicer is exempt from the application procedures described in subsections A and B of §

6.2-2603

upon determination by the Commissioner that the person (i) has an agreement with the U.S. Secretary of Education under 20 U.S.C. § 1078(b), solely to the extent of the person’s actions as a guarantor that engages in averting defaults, or (ii) is a party to a contract awarded by the U.S. Secretary of Education under 20 U.S.C. § 1087f. The Commissioner shall prescribe the procedure to document eligibility for this exemption.

With regard to a person exempted from the application procedures described in subsections A and B of §

6.2-2603

pursuant to subsection A, the Commissioner shall:

Automatically issue a license upon payment of the fee required by subsection C of §

6.2-2603

and the providing of the bond required by §

6.2-2604

;

Automatically renew a license upon payment of the fees required by subsection E of §

6.2-2607

; and

Deem the person to have met all the requirements set forth in subsections A and B of § 6.2-2603.

A person issued a license pursuant to subdivision B 1:

Is exempt from subsections A and B of §

6.2-2603

; and

Shall comply with the record requirements in §

6.2-2608

except to the extent that the requirements are inconsistent with federal law.

A person issued a license pursuant to subdivision B 1 shall, within seven days after receiving notification of the expiration, revocation, or termination of (i) an agreement with the U.S. Secretary of Education under 20 U.S.C. § 1078(b) or (ii) any contract awarded by the U.S. Secretary of Education under 20 U.S.C. § 1087f, provide the Commissioner with written notice of such expiration, revocation, or termination. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, such person’s license shall automatically expire 30 days after the expiration, revocation, or termination of such person’s contract. A person seeking to act as a qualified education loan servicer following the expiration of its license may apply for a new license by filing an application that meets the requirements of §§

6.2-2603

and

6.2-2604

and subsection B of §

6.2-2605

.

With respect to qualified education loan servicing not conducted pursuant to (i) an agreement with the U.S. Secretary of Education under 20 U.S.C. § 1078(b) or (ii) a contract awarded by the U.S. Secretary of Education under 20 U.S.C. § 1087f, nothing in this section prevents the Commission from issuing an order to temporarily or permanently prohibit or bar any person from acting as a qualified education loan servicer or violating applicable law.

In the case of qualified education loan servicing conducted pursuant to (i) an agreement with the U.S. Secretary of Education under 20 U.S.C. § 1078(b) or (ii) a contract awarded by the U.S. Secretary of Education under 20 U.S.C. § 1087f, nothing in this section shall prevent the Commission from issuing a cease and desist order or injunction against any qualified education loan servicer to cease activities in violation of this act.

History.

2020, cc. 1198, 1250.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1198 and 1250, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 6.2-2603.
Application for license; form; content; fee.

An application for a license under this chapter shall be made in writing and on a form provided by the Commission.

The application shall set forth:

The name and address of the applicant, the name and address of each senior officer, and (i) if the applicant is a partnership, firm, or association, the name and address of each partner or member; (ii) if the applicant is a corporation or limited liability company, the name and address of each director, member, registered agent, and principal; or (iii) if the applicant is a business trust, the name and address of each trustee;

The address of the principal place of business to be licensed;

Such other information concerning the financial responsibility, background, experience, and general fitness of the applicant and its members, senior officers, directors, trustees, and principals as the Commissioner may require; and

Any other pertinent information that the Commissioner may require.

The application shall be accompanied by payment of a nonrefundable application fee as prescribed by the Commission. The fee shall not be abated by surrender, suspension, or revocation of the license.

If the Commissioner requests information to complete a deficient application and the information is not received within 60 days of the Commissioner’s request, the application shall be deemed abandoned unless a request for an extension of time is received and approved by the Commissioner prior to the expiration of the 60-day period. However, this subsection shall not be construed to prohibit the Commission from denying a license application that does not meet the requirements of this chapter.

History.

2020, cc. 1198, 1250.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1198 and 1250, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 6.2-2604.
Bond required.

The application for a license shall be accompanied by a bond filed with the Commissioner with corporate surety authorized to execute such bond, in the principal amount as determined by the Commissioner. The amount of the bond shall be not less than $50,000 nor more than $500,000. The form of such bond shall be approved by the Commissioner. Such bond shall be continuously maintained thereafter in full force. Such bond shall be conditioned upon the applicant or licensee performing all written agreements pertaining to qualified education loans, correctly and accurately accounting for all funds received by the applicant or licensee in connection with qualified education loans, and conducting its business in conformity with this chapter and all applicable laws. The aggregate liability under the bond shall not exceed the penal sum of the bond.

History.

2020, cc. 1198, 1250.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1198 and 1250, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 6.2-2605.
Investigation of applications.

The Commissioner may make such investigations as he deems necessary to determine if the applicant has complied with all applicable provisions of law and regulations.

For the purpose of investigating individuals who are members, senior officers, directors, trustees, and principals of an applicant, such persons shall consent to a criminal history records check and submit to fingerprinting. Each member, senior officer, director, trustee, and principal shall pay for the cost of such fingerprinting and criminal history records check. Such persons shall cause their fingerprints, personal descriptive information, and records check fees to be submitted to either of the following, as prescribed by the Commissioner:

The Bureau, which shall forward these items to the Central Criminal Records Exchange. The Central Criminal Records Exchange shall (i) conduct a search of its own criminal history records and forward such individuals’ fingerprints and personal descriptive information to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of obtaining national criminal history record information regarding such individuals and (ii) forward the results of the state and national records searches to the Commissioner or his designee, who shall be an employee of the Commission; or

The Registry, provided that it is capable of processing criminal history records checks.

If any member, senior officer, director, trustee, or principal of an applicant fails to cause his fingerprints, personal descriptive information, or records check fees to be submitted in accordance with subsection B, the application for a qualified education loan servicer license shall be denied.

History.

2020, cc. 1198, 1250.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1198 and 1250, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1198 and 1250, cl. 3 provides: “That on or before March 1, 2021, the State Corporation Commission shall begin accepting applications for licenses to be issued pursuant to Chapter 26 (§

6.2-2600

et seq.) of Title 6.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, when such chapter becomes effective. Applications filed with the Commission may be investigated prior to July 1, 2021, in accordance with §

6.2-2605

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act.”

§ 6.2-2606.
Qualifications.

Upon the filing and investigation of an application for a license, compliance by the applicant with the provisions of §§

6.2-2603

and

6.2-2604

, and compliance by the persons identified in subsection B of §

6.2-2605

with the provisions contained therein, the Commission shall issue and deliver to the applicant the license applied for to engage in business under this chapter at the location specified in the application if it finds that:

The financial responsibility, character, experience, and general fitness of the applicant and its members, senior officers, directors, trustees, and principals are such as to warrant belief that the business will be operated efficiently and fairly, in the public interest, and in accordance with the law;

The application does not contain any false statement of a material fact; and

The application does not omit any statement of a material fact that is required by §

6.2-2603

.

If the Commission fails to make such findings, no license shall be issued and the Commissioner shall notify the applicant of the denial and the reasons for such denial.

History.

2020, cc. 1198, 1250.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1198 and 1250, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 6.2-2607.
Licenses; place of business; changes; renewal.

Each license shall state the address at which the principal place of business is to be conducted and shall state fully the legal name of the licensee as well as any fictitious names by which the licensee is conducting business under this chapter. Licenses shall not be transferable or assignable, by operation of law or otherwise. No licensee shall use any names other than the legal name or fictitious names set forth on the license issued by the Commission.

Every licensee shall notify the Commissioner, in writing, at least 30 days prior to relocating its principal place of business and confirm the change in writing within five days after such relocation.

Every licensee shall within 10 days notify the Commissioner, in writing, of (i) any change to its legal name; (ii) any change to or additional fictitious name by which the licensee is conducting business under this chapter; and (iii) the name, address, and position of each new member, senior officer, director, trustee, and principal. At the direction of the Commissioner, any such individual shall be treated as a member, senior officer, director, trustee, or principal of an applicant for the purpose of being investigated pursuant to subsection B of §

6.2-2605

. The licensee shall provide such other information with respect to the changes and persons identified in this subsection as the Commissioner may reasonably require.

Every license shall remain in force until it expires or has been surrendered, revoked, or suspended. The expiration, surrender, revocation, or suspension of a license shall not affect any preexisting legal right or obligation of such licensee.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a qualified education loan servicer license shall expire at the end of each calendar year unless it is renewed by a licensee prior to the expiration date. A licensee may renew its license by (i) requesting renewal through the Registry and (ii) complying with any requirements associated with such renewal request that are imposed by the Registry. If a qualified education loan servicer license has expired, the Commission may by regulation permit the former licensee to seek license reinstatement after the license expiration date by renewing its license in accordance with this subsection and paying a reinstatement fee as prescribed by the Commission.

History.

2020, cc. 1198, 1250.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1198 and 1250, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 6.2-2608.
Retention of records; responding to the Bureau.

Each licensee shall maintain in its principal place of business such books, accounts, and records as the Commissioner may reasonably require in order to determine whether such person is complying with the provisions of this chapter and other laws applicable to the conduct of its business. Such books, accounts, and records shall be maintained apart and separate from any other business in which the qualified education loan servicer is involved. Each licensee shall maintain adequate records of each qualified education loan transaction for at least three years after final payment is made on such loan or the assignment of such qualified education loan, whichever occurs first.

To safeguard the privacy of qualified education loan borrowers, records containing personal financial information shall be shredded, incinerated, or otherwise disposed of by a licensee in a secure manner. Licensees may arrange for the shredding, incineration, or other disposal of the records from a business record destruction vendor.

When the Bureau requests a written response, books, records, documentation, or other information from a licensee in connection with the Bureau’s investigation, enforcement, or examination of compliance with applicable laws, the licensee shall deliver a written response as well as any requested books, records, documentation, or information within the time period specified in the Bureau’s request. If no time period is specified, a written response as well as any requested books, records, documentation, or information shall be delivered by the licensee to the Bureau not later than 30 days from the date of such request. In determining the specified time period for responding to the Bureau and when considering a request for an extension of time to respond, the Bureau shall take into consideration the volume and complexity of the requested written response, books, records, documentation, or information and such other factors as the Bureau determines to be relevant under the circumstances.

History.

2020, cc. 1198, 1250.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1198 and 1250, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 6.2-2609.
Acquisition of control; application.

Except as provided in this section, no person shall acquire, directly or indirectly, 25 percent or more of the voting shares of a corporation or 25 percent or more of the ownership of any other person licensed to conduct business under this chapter unless such person first:

Files an application with the Commission in such form as the Commissioner may prescribe from time to time;

Delivers such other information to the Commissioner as the Commissioner may require concerning the financial responsibility, background, experience, and general fitness of the applicant and of any proposed new directors, senior officers, principals, trustees, or members of the licensee;

Submits and furnishes to the Commissioner information concerning the identity of the applicant and of any proposed new directors, senior officers, principals, trustees, or members of the licensee. Such individuals shall (i) consent to a criminal history records check, submit to fingerprinting, and pay for the cost of such fingerprinting and criminal records check and (ii) cause their fingerprints, personal descriptive information, and records check fees to be submitted to either of the following, as prescribed by the Commissioner:

The Bureau, who shall forward these items to the Central Criminal Records Exchange. The Central Criminal Records Exchange shall (i) conduct searches of its own criminal history records and forward such individuals’ fingerprints and personal descriptive information to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of obtaining national criminal history record information regarding such individuals and (ii) forward the results of the state and national records search to the Commissioner or his designee, who shall be an employee of the Commission; or

The Registry, provided that it is capable of processing criminal history records checks; and

Pays such application fee as the Commission may prescribe.

Upon the filing and investigation of an application, the Commission shall permit the applicant to acquire the interest in the licensee if it finds that the applicant and any proposed new directors, members, senior officers, trustees, and principals of the licensee have the financial responsibility, character, experience, and general fitness to warrant belief that the business will be operated efficiently and fairly, in the public interest, and in accordance with law. The Commission shall grant or deny the application within 60 days from the date a completed application accompanied by the required fee is filed unless the period is extended by order of the Commissioner giving the reasons for the extension. If the application is denied, the Commission shall notify the applicant of the denial and the reasons for the denial.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to the acquisition of an interest in a licensee (i) directly or indirectly, including an acquisition by merger or consolidation, by or with a person licensed or exempt from licensing under this chapter; (ii) directly or indirectly, by merger or consolidation by or with a person affiliated through common ownership with the licensee; or (iii) by bequest, descent, survivorship, or operation of law. This section shall also not apply to the acquisition of an interest in a licensee that (i) an agreement with the U.S. Secretary of Education under 20 U.S.C. § 1078(b) or (ii) is a party to a contract awarded by the U.S. Secretary of Education under 20 U.S.C. § 1087f. The person acquiring an interest in a licensee in a transaction that is exempt from filing an application by this subsection shall send written notice of such acquisition to the Commissioner within 30 days of its closing.

History.

2020, cc. 1198, 1250.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1198 and 1250, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 6.2-2610.
Prohibited activities; compliance with federal laws and regulations.

No qualified education loan servicer shall:

Directly or indirectly employ any scheme, device, or artifice to defraud or mislead qualified education loan borrowers;

Engage in any unfair or deceptive act or practice toward any person or misrepresent or omit any material information in connection with the servicing of a qualified education loan, including misrepresenting (i) the amount, nature, or terms of any fee or payment due or claimed to be due on a qualified education loan; (ii) the terms and conditions of the loan agreement; or (iii) the borrower’s obligations under the loan;

Obtain property by fraud or misrepresentation;

Misapply qualified education loan payments to the outstanding balance of a qualified education loan;

Provide inaccurate information to a nationally recognized consumer credit bureau;

Fail to report both the favorable and unfavorable payment history of the borrower to a nationally recognized consumer credit bureau at least annually if the loan servicer regularly reports information to such a credit bureau;

Fail to communicate with an authorized representative of the borrower who provides a written authorization signed by the borrower, provided that the loan servicer may adopt procedures reasonably related to verifying that the representative is in fact authorized to act on behalf of the borrower;

Make any false statement of a material fact or omit any material fact in connection with any information provided to the Commission or another governmental authority; or

Engage in any other prohibited activities identified in regulations adopted by the Commission pursuant to this chapter.

A qualified education loan servicer shall comply with all federal laws and regulations applicable to the conduct of its licensed business. In addition to any other remedies provided by law, a violation of any such federal law or regulation shall be deemed a violation of this chapter and a basis upon which the Commission may take enforcement action pursuant to §

6.2-2615

,

6.2-2617

, or

6.2-2618

.

A qualified education loan servicer shall not engage in abusive acts or practices when servicing a qualified education loan. An act or practice is abusive in connection with the servicing of a qualified education loan if the act or practice does either of the following:

Materially interferes with the ability of a borrower to understand a term or condition of a qualified education loan; or

Takes unreasonable advantage of:

A lack of understanding on the part of a qualified education loan borrower of the material risks, costs, or conditions of the qualified education loan;

The reasonable reliance by the borrower on a person engaged in the servicing of a qualified education loan to act in the interests of the borrower; or

The inability of a borrower to protect the interests of the borrower when selecting (i) a qualified education loan or (ii) a feature, term, or condition of a qualified education loan.

History.

2020, cc. 1198, 1250.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1198 and 1250, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 6.2-2611.
Affirmative acts required of qualified education loan servicers.

Except to the extent that this section is inconsistent with any provision of federal law or regulation, and then only to the extent of the inconsistency, a person engaged in qualified education loan servicing shall:

Evaluate a qualified education loan borrower for eligibility for an income-driven repayment program prior to placing the borrower in forbearance or default, if an income-driven repayment program is available to the borrower;

Respond to a written inquiry from a qualified education loan borrower or the representative of a qualified education loan borrower within 10 business days after receipt of the request and, within 30 business days after receipt of the request, provide information relating to the request and, if applicable, to the action the qualified education loan servicer will take to correct the account or an explanation for the qualified education loan servicer’s position that the borrower’s account is correct. Such 30-day period may be extended for not more than 15 days if, before the end of the 30-day period, the qualified education loan servicer notifies the borrower, or the borrower’s representative, as applicable, of the extension and the reasons for the delay in responding;

Not furnish to a consumer reporting agency, during 60 days following receipt of a written request related to a dispute on a borrower’s payment on a qualified education loan, information regarding a payment that is the subject of the written request;

Except as provided in federal law or required by a qualified education loan agreement, inquire of a borrower how to apply an overpayment to a qualified education loan. A borrower’s direction on how to apply an overpayment to a qualified education loan shall remain in effect for any future overpayments during the term of a qualified education loan or until the borrower provides different directions. As used in this subdivision, “overpayment” means a payment on a qualified education loan that exceeds the monthly amount due from a borrower on the qualified education loan, which payment may be referred to as a prepayment;

Apply partial payments in a manner that minimizes late fees and negative credit reporting. If loans on a borrower’s qualified education loan account have an equal level of delinquency, a qualified education loan servicer shall apply partial payments to satisfy as many individual loan payments as possible on a borrower’s account. As used in this subdivision, “partial payment” means a payment on a qualified education loan account that contains multiple individual loans in an amount less than the amount necessary to satisfy the outstanding payment due on all loans in the qualified education loan account, which payment may be referred to as an underpayment;

Require, as a condition of a sale, an assignment, or any other transfer of the servicing of a qualified education loan, that the new loan servicer honor all benefits originally represented as available to a qualified education loan borrower during the repayment of the qualified education loan and preserve the availability of the benefits, including any benefits for which the qualified education loan borrower has not yet qualified. If a qualified education loan servicer is not also the loan holder or is not acting on behalf of the loan holder, the loan servicer satisfies the requirement of this subsection by providing the new loan servicer with information necessary for the new loan servicer to honor all benefits originally represented as available to a qualified education loan borrower during the repayment of the qualified education loan and preserve the availability of the benefits, including any benefits for which the loan borrower has not yet qualified; and

In the event of a sale, assignment, or other transfer of the servicing of a qualified education loan that results in a change in the identity of the person to whom a qualified education loan borrower is required to send payments or direct any communication concerning the qualified education loan:

Transfer to the new loan servicer all records regarding the qualified education loan borrower, the account of the loan borrower, and the qualified education loan of the loan borrower. Such records include the repayment status of the qualified education loan borrower and any benefits associated with the qualified education loan of the loan borrower. The transfer of records shall be completed within 45 days after the sale, assignment, or other transfer of the servicing of a qualified education loan;

Notify affected qualified education loan borrowers of the sale, assignment, or other transfer of the servicing of a qualified education loan at least seven days before the next payment on the loan is due. The notice shall include (i) the identity of the new qualified education loan servicer; (ii) the effective date of the transfer of the borrower’s qualified education loan to the new loan servicer; (iii) the date on which the existing loan servicer will no longer accept payments; and (iv) the contact information for the new loan servicer; and

Adopt policies and procedures to verify that the new qualified education loan servicer has received all records regarding the qualified education loan borrower, the account of the qualified education loan borrower, and the qualified education loan of the borrower, including the repayment status of the qualified education loan borrower and any benefits associated with the qualified education loan of the borrower.

History.

2020, cc. 1198, 1250.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1198 and 1250, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 6.2-2612.
Reporting requirements.

Within 15 days following the occurrence of any of the following events, a licensee shall file a written report with the Commission describing such event and its expected impact upon the business of the licensee:

The filing of bankruptcy, reorganization, or receivership proceedings by or against the licensee;

The institution of administrative or regulatory proceedings against the licensee by any governmental authority;

Any felony indictment of the licensee or any of its members, directors, senior officers, trustees, or principals;

Any felony conviction of the licensee or any of its members, directors, senior officers, trustees, or principals; and

Such other events as the Commission may prescribe by regulation.

Each licensee shall file periodic written reports with the Commissioner or the Registry containing such information as the Commissioner may require concerning the licensee’s business and operations. Reports shall be in the form and be submitted with such frequency and by such dates as may be prescribed by the Commissioner.

History.

2020, cc. 1198, 1250.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1198 and 1250, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1198 and 1250, cl. 4 provides: “That the State Corporation Commission (the Commission) shall provide a report to members of the House Committee on Labor and Commerce, the Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor, the House Committee on Education, and the Senate Committee on Education and Health on or before November 1, 2022, that contains the following: (i) the number of licenses issued under Chapter 26 (§

6.2-2600

et seq.) of Title 6.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act (the Chapter); (ii) the number of applications for a license under the Chapter that have been denied and the reasons for such denials; (iii) the number of licensees under the Chapter that filed a written report with the Commission pursuant to subsection A of §

6.2-2612

, as created by this act, and for which of the events enumerated in subdivisions A 1 through 5 of §

6.2-2612

, as created by this act, the written report was filed; (iv) the number and nature of complaints received under the Chapter; and (v) the number of investigations and examinations resulting from such complaints and the disposition of such investigations and examinations.”